Hawaii, session 2025, HB452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a need for increased meat processing capacity in the State, as smaller ranchers and hunters compete for limited capacity, resulting in the loss of potential use of wild game meat. The legislature further finds that axis deer, an invasive species that poses a continuing threat to Hawaii's environment, and other wild game could provide significant quantities of meat as a protein source for non-profit food distribution services, enhancing the State's food security.  However, there is a gap between the hunters and these non-profit services because the meat needs to be processed prior to distribution.  Other states have developed processes for this purpose, including licensing fees and funding managed by wildlife agencies or non-profits. The purpose of this Act is to require and appropriate funds for the department of business, economic development, and tourism to develop and implement a grant program to expand the meat processing capacity in the State. SECTION 2.  (a) The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall develop and implement a grant program to expand the meat processing capacity in the State.  The grant program may include financial assistance to establish new meat processing facilities with a donation component or expand existing facilities to include a donation component to enable hunters to donate meat from axis deer and other wild game to these facilities. (b)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism may collaborate with the department of agriculture, department of land and natural resources' division of forestry and wildlife, and department of health's food safety branch in developing the grant program. (c)  The program shall provide grants to qualified applicants with the following terms and conditions: (1)  No grants shall be given unless money has been spent by the applicant toward expanding the meat processing capacity in the State; (2)  The total amount of a grant to any one applicant shall not exceed $          ; and (3)  No grant shall be given for costs that were incurred more than five years prior to the time the application for the grant is received by the department of business, economic development, and tourism. (d)  Applications for grants shall be made to the department of business, economic development, and tourism and contain the information as shall be required by rules adopted thereunder.  At a minimum, the applicant shall: (1)  Be licensed or accredited, in accordance with federal, state, or county statutes, rules, or ordinances, to conduct the activities or provide the services for which a grant is awarded; (2)  Provide a detailed plan outlining the scope, objectives, and projected impact of the project or projects and a clear breakdown of how grant funds will be utilized; (3)  Agree to use state funds exclusively for the purposes of this program; (4)  Indicate capability to properly use the grant for the purpose of the grant program; (5)  Comply with all applicable federal and state laws prohibiting discrimination against any person on the basis of race, color, national origin, religion, creed, sex, age, sexual orientation, disability, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal or state law; (6)  Agree not to use state funds for purposes of entertainment or perquisites; (7)  Comply with other requirements as the department may prescribe; (8)  Comply with all applicable federal, state, and county statutes, rules, and ordinances; (9)  Agree to indemnify and save harmless the State of Hawaii and its officers, agents, and employees from and against any and all claims arising out of or resulting from activities carried out or projects undertaken with funds provided hereunder and procure sufficient insurance to provide this indemnification if requested to do so by the department; and (10)  Agree to make available to the department all records the applicant may have relating to the grant to allow state agencies to monitor the applicant's compliance with this subsection. (e)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to carry out the purposes of the grant program.  The grant applications shall be reviewed and approved by an administrative staff member of the department of business, economic development, and tourism. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the grant program to expand the meat processing capacity in the State pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.